District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.18

Title of trust property.

Real or personal property that is transferred to a trust may be titled in the name of:

(1)

The trust by reference to the instrument creating the trust;

(2)

The current trustee as the trustee of such trust; or

(3)

“The trustee” as the trustee of such trust.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208